Oklahoma, session 2025, SB170.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 18b, as last


amended by Section 170, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (74 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 18b), is amended to read as follows:


Section 18b. A. The duties of the Attorney General as the


chief law officer of the state shall be:


1. To appear for the state and prosecute and defend all actions


and proceedings, civil or criminal, in the Supreme Court and Court


of Criminal Appeals in which the state is interested as a party;


2. To appear for the state and prosecute and defend all actions


and proceedings in any of the federal courts in which the state is


interested as a party;



Req. No. 375 Page 1


3. To initiate or appear in any action in which the interests


of the state or the people of the state are at issue, or to appear


at the request of the Governor, the Legislature, or either branch


thereof, and prosecute and defend in any court or before any


commission, board or officers any cause or proceeding, civil or


criminal, in which the state may be a party or interested; and when


so appearing in any such cause or proceeding, the Attorney General


may, if the Attorney General deems it advisable and to the best


interest of the state, take and assume control of the prosecution or


defense of the state’s interest therein;


4. To consult with and advise district attorneys, when


requested by them, in all matters pertaining to the duties of their


offices, when the district attorneys shall furnish the Attorney


General with a written opinion supported by citation of authorities


upon the matter submitted;


5. To give an opinion in writing upon all questions of law


submitted to the Attorney General by the Legislature or either


branch thereof, or by any state officer, board, commission or


department, provided, that the Attorney General shall not furnish


opinions to any but district attorneys, the Legislature or either


branch thereof, or any other state official, board, commission or


department, and to them only upon matters in which they are


officially interested;



Req. No. 375 Page 2


6. At the request of the Governor, State Auditor and Inspector,


State Treasurer, or either branch of the Legislature, to prosecute


any official bond or any contract in which the state is interested,


upon a breach thereof, and to prosecute or defend for the state all


actions, civil or criminal, relating to any matter connected with


either of their Departments;


7. Whenever requested by any state officer, board or


commission, to prepare proper drafts for contracts, forms and other


writing which may be wanted for the use of the state;


8. To prepare drafts of bills and resolutions for individual


members of the Legislature upon their written request stating the


gist of the bill or resolution desired;


9. To enforce the proper application of monies appropriated by


the Legislature and to prosecute breaches of trust in the


administration of such funds;


10. To institute actions to recover state monies illegally


expended, to recover state property and to prevent the illegal use


of any state property, upon the request of the Governor or the


Legislature;


11. To pay into the State Treasury, immediately upon its


receipt, all monies received by the Attorney General belonging to


the state other than monies received on behalf of the Oklahoma


Municipal Power Authority;



Req. No. 375 Page 3


12. To settle, compromise and dispose of an action in which the


Attorney General represents the interests of the state, so long as


the consideration negotiated for such settlement, compromise or


disposition is payable to the state or one of its agencies which is


a named party of the action and any monies, any property or other


item of value is paid first to the State Treasury;


13. To keep and file copies of all opinions, contracts, forms


and letters of the office, and to keep an index of all opinions,


contracts and forms according to subject and section of the law


construed or applied;


14. To keep a register or docket of all actions, demands and


investigations prosecuted, defended or conducted by the Attorney


General in behalf of the state. The register or docket shall give


the style of the case or investigation, where pending, court number,


office number, the gist of the matter, result and the names of the


assistants who handled the matter;


15. To keep a complete office file of all cases and


investigations handled by the Attorney General on behalf of the


state;


16. To report to the Legislature or either branch thereof


whenever requested upon any business relating to the duties of the


Attorney General’s office;


17. To institute civil actions against members of any state


board or commission for failure of such members to perform their

Req. No. 375 Page 4


duties as prescribed by the statutes and the Constitution and to


prosecute members of any state board or commission for violation of


the criminal laws of this state where such violations have occurred


in connection with the performance of such members’ official duties;


18. To respond to any request for an opinion of the Attorney


General’s office, submitted by a member of the Legislature,


regardless of subject matter, by written opinion determinative of


the law regarding such subject matter;


19. To convene multicounty grand juries in such manner and for


such purposes as provided by law; provided, such grand juries are


composed of citizens from each of the counties on a pro rata basis


by county;


20. To investigate any report by the State Auditor and


Inspector filed with the Attorney General pursuant to Section 223 of


this title and prosecute all actions, civil or criminal, relating to


such reports or any irregularities or derelictions in the management


of public funds or property which are violations of the laws of this


state;


21. To represent and protect the collective interests of all


utility consumers of this state in rate-related proceedings before


the Corporation Commission or in any other state or federal judicial


or administrative proceeding;


22. To represent and protect the collective interests of


insurance consumers of this state in rate-related proceedings before

Req. No. 375 Page 5


the Insurance Commissioner or in any other state or federal judicial


or administrative proceeding;


23. To investigate and prosecute any criminal action relating


to insurance fraud, if in the opinion of the Attorney General a


criminal prosecution is warranted, or to refer such matters to the


appropriate district attorney;


24. To monitor and evaluate any action by the federal


government including, but not limited to, executive orders by the


President of the United States, rules or regulations promulgated by


an agency of the federal government or acts of Congress to determine


if such actions are in violation of the Tenth Amendment to the


Constitution of the United States;


25. To cross-deputize police officers of the police department


of any municipality or any officer deputized by the county sheriff


or a designee subject to an interlocal governmental agreement with


the Office of the Attorney General’s Office General in an effort to


combine city, county, and state law enforcement efforts and to


encourage cooperation between city, county, and state law


enforcement officials. Liability for the conduct of any municipal


police officer cross-deputized under the terms and conditions of an


interlocal governmental agreement or any officer deputized by the


county sheriff under the terms and conditions of an interlocal


governmental agreement shall remain the responsibility of the


respective employer for that officer; and

Req. No. 375 Page 6


26. To maintain data related to human trafficking and to assist


law enforcement, social service agencies, and victim services


programs in identifying and supporting victims of human trafficking.


B. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring the


Attorney General to appear and defend or prosecute in any court any


cause or proceeding for or on behalf of the Oklahoma Tax Commission,


the Board of Managers of the State Insurance Fund, or the


Commissioners of the Land Office.


C. In all appeals from the Corporation Commission to the


Supreme Court of Oklahoma in which the state is a party, the


Attorney General shall have the right to designate counsel of the


Corporation Commission as the Attorney General’s legally appointed


representative in such appeals, and it shall be the duty of the


Corporation Commission counsel to act when so designated and to


consult and advise with the Attorney General regarding such appeals


prior to taking action therein.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-375 TEK 12/30/2024 12:31:13 PM





Req. No. 375 Page 7